test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_konaas_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     konaas: konaas
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1konaas: nikonaas
     +Px2konaas: gikonaas
     +Px3konaas: okonaas
     +PxIndefkonaas: ikonaas
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     konaas+Con: konaasenh
     konaas+Dim: konaasens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     konaas+Pos: konaasim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     konaas+Pej: konaasish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     konaas+Pos1Pl: konaasinaan
     konaas+PosObv: konaasini
     konaas+PosPl: konaasiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     konaas+Pret: konaasiban
     konaas+VocPl: konaas***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     konaas+Loc: konaasing
     konaas+Obv: konaasan
     konaas+Pl: konaasag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1konaas+Con: nikonaasenh
     +Px1konaas+Dim: nikonaasens
     +Px2konaas+Con: gikonaasenh
     +Px2konaas+Dim: gikonaasens
     +Px3konaas+Con: okonaasenh
     +Px3konaas+Dim: okonaasens
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con: ikonaasenh
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim: ikonaasens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1konaas+Pos: nikonaasim
     +Px2konaas+Pos: gikonaasim
     +Px3konaas+Pos: okonaasim
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos: ikonaasim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1konaas+Pej: nikonaasish
     +Px2konaas+Pej: gikonaasish
     +Px3konaas+Pej: okonaasish
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej: ikonaasish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1konaas+Pos1Pl: nikonaasinaan
     +Px1konaas+PosObv: nikonaasini
     +Px1konaas+PosPl: nikonaasiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Pos1Pl: gikonaasinaan
     +Px2konaas+PosObv: gikonaasini
     +Px2konaas+PosPl: gikonaasiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Pos1Pl: okonaasinaan
     +Px3konaas+PosObv: okonaasini
     +Px3konaas+PosPl: okonaasiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos1Pl: ikonaasinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+PosObv: ikonaasini
     +PxIndefkonaas+PosPl: ikonaasiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1konaas+Pret: nikonaasiban
     +Px1konaas+VocPl: nikonaas***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Pret: gikonaasiban
     +Px2konaas+VocPl: gikonaas***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Pret: okonaasiban
     +Px3konaas+VocPl: okonaas***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pret: ikonaasiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+VocPl: ikonaas***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1konaas+Loc: nikonaasing
     +Px1konaas+Obv: nikonaasan
     +Px1konaas+Pl: nikonaasag
     +Px2konaas+Loc: gikonaasing
     +Px2konaas+Obv: gikonaasan
     +Px2konaas+Pl: gikonaasag
     +Px3konaas+Loc: okonaasing
     +Px3konaas+Obv: okonaasan
     +Px3konaas+Pl: okonaasag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Loc: ikonaasing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Obv: ikonaasan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pl: ikonaasag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     konaas+Con+Pos: konaasenhim
     konaas+Dim+Pos: konaasensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     konaas+Con+Pej: konaasenhish
     konaas+Dim+Pej: konaasensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl: konaasenhinaan
     konaas+Con+PosObv: konaasenhini
     konaas+Con+PosPl: konaasenhiwaa
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl: konaasensinaan
     konaas+Dim+PosObv: konaasensini
     konaas+Dim+PosPl: konaasensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     konaas+Con+Pret: konaasenhiban
     konaas+Con+VocPl: konaasenh***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pret: konaasensiban
     konaas+Dim+VocPl: konaasens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     konaas+Con+Loc: konaasenhing
     konaas+Con+Obv: konaasenhan
     konaas+Con+Pl: konaasenhag
     konaas+Dim+Loc: konaasensing
     konaas+Dim+Obv: konaasensan
     konaas+Dim+Pl: konaasensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     konaas+Pos+Pej: konaasimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl: konaasiminaan
     konaas+Pos+PosObv: konaasimini
     konaas+Pos+PosPl: konaasimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     konaas+Pos+Pret: konaasimiban
     konaas+Pos+VocPl: konaasim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     konaas+Pos+Loc: konaasiming
     konaas+Pos+Obv: konaasiman
     konaas+Pos+Pl: konaasimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl: konaasishinaan
     konaas+Pej+PosObv: konaasishini
     konaas+Pej+PosPl: konaasishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     konaas+Pej+Pret: konaasishiban
     konaas+Pej+VocPl: konaasish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     konaas+Pej+Loc: konaasishing
     konaas+Pej+Obv: konaasishan
     konaas+Pej+Pl: konaasishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     konaas+Pos1Pl+Pret: konaasinaaniban
     konaas+Pos1Pl+VocPl: konaasinaan***idig, idog***
     konaas+PosObv+Pret: konaasiniiban
     konaas+PosObv+VocPl: konaasini***idig, idog***
     konaas+PosPl+Pret: konaasiwaaiban
     konaas+PosPl+VocPl: konaasiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     konaas+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasinaaning
     konaas+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasinaanan
     konaas+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasinaanag
     konaas+PosObv+Loc: konaasiniing
     konaas+PosObv+Obv: konaasinian
     konaas+PosObv+Pl: konaasiniag
     konaas+PosPl+Loc: konaasiwaaing
     konaas+PosPl+Obv: konaasiwaaan
     konaas+PosPl+Pl: konaasiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     konaas+Pret+Loc: konaasibaning
     konaas+Pret+Obv: konaasibanan
     konaas+Pret+Pl: konaasibanag
     konaas+VocPl+Loc: konaas***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+VocPl+Obv: konaas***idig, idog***an
     konaas+VocPl+Pl: konaas***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos: nikonaasenhim
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos: nikonaasensim
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos: gikonaasenhim
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos: gikonaasensim
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos: okonaasenhim
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos: okonaasensim
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos: ikonaasenhim
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos: ikonaasensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pej: nikonaasenhish
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pej: nikonaasensish
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pej: gikonaasenhish
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pej: gikonaasensish
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pej: okonaasenhish
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pej: okonaasensish
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pej: ikonaasenhish
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pej: ikonaasensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos1Pl: nikonaasenhinaan
     +Px1konaas+Con+PosObv: nikonaasenhini
     +Px1konaas+Con+PosPl: nikonaasenhiwaa
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl: nikonaasensinaan
     +Px1konaas+Dim+PosObv: nikonaasensini
     +Px1konaas+Dim+PosPl: nikonaasensiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos1Pl: gikonaasenhinaan
     +Px2konaas+Con+PosObv: gikonaasenhini
     +Px2konaas+Con+PosPl: gikonaasenhiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl: gikonaasensinaan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+PosObv: gikonaasensini
     +Px2konaas+Dim+PosPl: gikonaasensiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos1Pl: okonaasenhinaan
     +Px3konaas+Con+PosObv: okonaasenhini
     +Px3konaas+Con+PosPl: okonaasenhiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl: okonaasensinaan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+PosObv: okonaasensini
     +Px3konaas+Dim+PosPl: okonaasensiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos1Pl: ikonaasenhinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+PosObv: ikonaasenhini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+PosPl: ikonaasenhiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos1Pl: ikonaasensinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+PosObv: ikonaasensini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+PosPl: ikonaasensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pret: nikonaasenhiban
     +Px1konaas+Con+VocPl: nikonaasenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pret: nikonaasensiban
     +Px1konaas+Dim+VocPl: nikonaasens***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pret: gikonaasenhiban
     +Px2konaas+Con+VocPl: gikonaasenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pret: gikonaasensiban
     +Px2konaas+Dim+VocPl: gikonaasens***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pret: okonaasenhiban
     +Px3konaas+Con+VocPl: okonaasenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pret: okonaasensiban
     +Px3konaas+Dim+VocPl: okonaasens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pret: ikonaasenhiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+VocPl: ikonaasenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pret: ikonaasensiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+VocPl: ikonaasens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1konaas+Con+Loc: nikonaasenhing
     +Px1konaas+Con+Obv: nikonaasenhan
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pl: nikonaasenhag
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Loc: nikonaasensing
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Obv: nikonaasensan
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pl: nikonaasensag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Loc: gikonaasenhing
     +Px2konaas+Con+Obv: gikonaasenhan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pl: gikonaasenhag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Loc: gikonaasensing
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Obv: gikonaasensan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pl: gikonaasensag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Loc: okonaasenhing
     +Px3konaas+Con+Obv: okonaasenhan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pl: okonaasenhag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Loc: okonaasensing
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Obv: okonaasensan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pl: okonaasensag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Loc: ikonaasenhing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Obv: ikonaasenhan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pl: ikonaasenhag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Loc: ikonaasensing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Obv: ikonaasensan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pl: ikonaasensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Pej: nikonaasimish
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pej: gikonaasimish
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pej: okonaasimish
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pej: ikonaasimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl: nikonaasiminaan
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosObv: nikonaasimini
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl: nikonaasimiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl: gikonaasiminaan
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv: gikonaasimini
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl: gikonaasimiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl: okonaasiminaan
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv: okonaasimini
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl: okonaasimiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl: ikonaasiminaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv: ikonaasimini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl: ikonaasimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Pret: nikonaasimiban
     +Px1konaas+Pos+VocPl: nikonaasim***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pret: gikonaasimiban
     +Px2konaas+Pos+VocPl: gikonaasim***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pret: okonaasimiban
     +Px3konaas+Pos+VocPl: okonaasim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pret: ikonaasimiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+VocPl: ikonaasim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Loc: nikonaasiming
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Obv: nikonaasiman
     +Px1konaas+Pos+Pl: nikonaasimag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Loc: gikonaasiming
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Obv: gikonaasiman
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pl: gikonaasimag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Loc: okonaasiming
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Obv: okonaasiman
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pl: okonaasimag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Loc: ikonaasiming
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Obv: ikonaasiman
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pl: ikonaasimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikonaasishinaan
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv: nikonaasishini
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl: nikonaasishiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl: gikonaasishinaan
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv: gikonaasishini
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl: gikonaasishiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl: okonaasishinaan
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv: okonaasishini
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl: okonaasishiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikonaasishinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv: ikonaasishini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl: ikonaasishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pret: nikonaasishiban
     +Px1konaas+Pej+VocPl: nikonaasish***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pret: gikonaasishiban
     +Px2konaas+Pej+VocPl: gikonaasish***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pret: okonaasishiban
     +Px3konaas+Pej+VocPl: okonaasish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pret: ikonaasishiban
